District of Columbia statutes.
47-402

Deputy Collector of Taxes.

The Deputy Collector of Taxes shall perform such duties as may be required of him by the Collector, and the Collector may require the said Deputy Collector to give bond for the faithful performance of his duties; but the Collector shall in every respect be responsible, as now provided by law, to the United States, the District of Columbia, and to individuals, as the case may be, for all moneys collected.

June 11, 1896, 29 Stat. 394, ch. 419
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.
1973 Ed., § 47-303.
1981 Ed., § 47-402.